Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-214
Collective bargaining; race or color discrimination prohibited.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that no representative agency of labor, in collective bargaining with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or other conditions of work, shall, in such collective bargaining, discriminate against any person because of his race or color. The Department of Labor shall be and hereby is charged with the duty of enforcement of this policy in conformity with Article I of the Constitution of Nebraska and section 1 of the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States of America.

Laws 1941, c. 96, § 1, p. 406;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-801;

R.S.1943, § 48-214.

Actions of employees in collective bargaining with employers, designation of plaintiff, process, and execution of judgment, see sections 25-313 and 25-530.08.

Civil rights, see Chapter 20.

Enforcement of policy of collective bargaining in labor disputes was a matter of statewide and not local concern. Midwest Employers Council, Inc. v. City of Omaha, 177 Neb. 877, 131 N.W.2d 609 (1964).